California, session 20252026, AB1151.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 13000 of the Vehicle Code is amended to read:13000. (a) (1) The department may issue an identification card to any person attesting to the true full name, correct age, and other identifying data as certified by the applicant for the identification card.(2) The department may not issue a Real ID identification card to a person who holds a Real ID driver’s license.(3) The department may cancel an identification card in order to enable compliance with paragraph (2).(b) (1) Any person 62 years of age or older may apply for, and the department upon receipt of a proper application therefor shall issue, an identification card bearing the notation “Senior Citizen.”(2) The department shall amend any forms used for the cancellation or surrender of a driver’s license to allow a person 62 years of age or older to apply for an identification card using the same form. Upon receipt of this amended form, the department shall issue an identification card bearing the notation “Senior Citizen” to the applicant.(c) Every application for an identification card shall be signed and verified by the applicant under penalty of perjury and shall be supported by bona fide documentary evidence of the age and identity of the applicant as the department may require.(d) Prior to the issuance of an identification card, the department shall confirm that a legible print of the thumb or finger of the applicant is on file with the department.(e) Any person 62 years of age or older, and any other qualified person, may apply for, or possess, an identification card under the provisions of either subdivision (a) or (b), but not under both of those provisions.SECTION 1.It is the intent of the Legislature to enact legislation related to the renewal of driver’s licenses.